Utah statutes.
53B-17-304.   Failure to comply with chapter is a misdemeanor.

A person who commits the following violations is guilty of a misdemeanor: (1) failure or neglect to give notice required under Subsection 53B-17-301(1); or (2) failure or neglect to forward a body upon request under Subsection 53B-17-301(3).

